Washington statutes.
RCW 31.12.850

Prohibited acts—Criminal penalties.

(1)(a) It is unlawful for a director, supervisory committee member, officer, employee, or agent of a credit union to knowingly violate or consent to a violation of this chapter.

(b) It is unlawful for any person to knowingly make or disseminate a false report or other misrepresentation about the financial condition of any credit union.

(c) Unless otherwise provided by law, a violation of this subsection is a misdemeanor under chapter 9A.20 RCW.

(2)(a) It is unlawful for a person to perform any of the following acts:

(i) To knowingly subscribe to, make, or cause to be made a false statement or entry in the books of a credit union;

(ii) To knowingly make a false statement or entry in a report required to be made to the director; or

(iii) To knowingly exhibit a false or fictitious paper, instrument, or security to a person authorized to examine a credit union.

(b) A violation of this subsection is a class C felony under chapter 9A.20 RCW.

[ 2010 c 87 s 15; 2003 c 53 s 193; 1997 c 397 s 87; 1994 c 92 s 215; 1984 c 31 s 65. Formerly RCW 31.12.635.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.